Hawaii statutes.
§26H-4 [OLD] REPEALED. L 1982, c 110,
§1.

§26H-4 Repeal dates for newly enacted
professional and vocational regulatory programs. (a) Any professional or
vocational regulatory program enacted after January 1, 1994, and listed in this
section shall be repealed as specified in this section. The auditor shall
perform an evaluation of the program, pursuant to section 26H-5, prior to its
repeal date.

(b) Chapter 466D (respiratory therapists)
shall be repealed on June 30, 2016.

(c) Chapter 436H (athletic trainers) shall be
repealed on June 30, 2018.

(d) Chapter 465D (behavior analysts) shall be
repealed on June 30, 2021. [L 1994, c 279, §3; am L 1996, c 202, §1; am L 1998,
c 100, §3 and c 159, §3; am L 2000, c 225, §2; am L 2002, c 260, §3; am L 2003,
c 97, §2; am L 2004, c 209, §3; am L 2008, c 206, §1; am L 2010, c 178, §3; am
L 2012, c 198, §3; am L 2015, c 199, §3]

Revision Note

The source notes for this section begin with L 1994, c 279,
§3 which replaced the contents of this section in its entirety.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next